Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1006
Hearings; continuance; rules of procedure.

At the hearing the board shall hear testimony and receive other evidence relating to the matter and may continue the hearing from time to time. The board shall adopt such rules of procedure as are advisable and in conformity with law.

Laws 1963, c. 397, § 6, p. 1262.